District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.07b

Reciprocal agreements.

The Mayor shall work with surrounding jurisdictions to update reciprocal agreements and shall submit a report to the Council on or before June 30, 2015, on his or her progress.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 8b
as added Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-270, § 2(c), 60 DCR 1717
Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-197, § 2(c), 61 DCR 12430
2001 Ed., § 50-307.02.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-270 added this section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-197 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-270, § 5, see § 7017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-270, § 5, see 7017 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-270 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7017 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-270, § 5.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-197: Section 7 of D.C. Law 20-197 provided, in part, that §§ 1, 2, 3, and 4 of the act shall apply as of March 10, 2015.